Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 1

Judicial Conferences

17-3-101. Creation — Membership.

There is created a judicial conference for the state whose membership shall consist of all judges of courts of records whose salary is paid in whole or in part out of the state treasury, including retired judges.

There shall also be included in the membership of the judicial conference active and retired judges who are licensed attorneys at law of all probate courts created by private acts of the state, in counties having a population of three hundred thousand (300,000) or more, according to the federal census of 1960 and any subsequent census.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, § 1 (Williams, § 738.13); 1965, ch. 262, § 1; 1969, ch. 64, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-401.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Judicial council, title 16, ch. 21, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Three Quarters of a Century in Judicial Administration (Delmar Karlen), 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 412.

Comparative Legislation. Judicial conference:

Ala. Code §12-8-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 476.320 et seq.

Va. Code § 16.1-218 et seq.; § 17-228 et seq.

17-3-102. Attorney general as advisor.

The attorney general and reporter shall be an ex officio member of the conference and act as its legal advisor.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, § 2 (Williams, § 738.14); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-402.

17-3-103. Officers — Executive committee — Expenses.

The judicial conference shall elect annually a president, vice president, secretary, treasurer and other officers that become necessary. The secretary may also serve as the treasurer.

There shall also be an executive committee of the conference to consist of the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, immediate past president, president-elect and nine (9) additional members to be appointed by the president, three (3) from each grand division of the state.

In making the president’s first appointments to the executive committee, the president shall name three (3) members from each grand division, one (1) for a term of one (1) year, and one (1) for a term of two (2) years, and one (1) for a term of three (3) years, and thereafter the president shall make all appointments for terms of three (3) years each, so that the terms of three (3) members shall expire each year, one (1) from each grand division.

When vacancies occur they shall be filled by appointments for the unexpired terms.

The executive committee shall meet at such times and places as designated by the president, upon due notice to each member.

Members of the executive committee shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary traveling expenses incurred in attending the meetings, not to exceed two (2) meetings in any fiscal year, pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, § 6 (Williams, § 738.18); 1957, ch. 392, § 1; 1959, ch. 284, § 1; 1963, ch. 199, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-403; Acts 1984, ch. 619, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 196, § 4.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

17-3-104. Annual meetings.

The conference shall meet annually for the consideration of any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its several members, to the end that there shall be a more prompt and efficient administration of justice in the courts of this state.

The conference shall set the time and place of each annual meeting.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, §§ 3, 6 (Williams, §§ 738.15, 738.18); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-404.

Cross-References. District attorney-general conference annual meeting to be held at same time, §8-7-304.

17-3-105. Duty of members to attend — Exception — Expenses.

It is the official duty of each member of the conference, with the exception of retired judges, to attend its annual meetings unless otherwise officially engaged or for other good and sufficient reasons.

Every member shall be entitled to have the member's expenses paid for attendance. The expenses shall be paid pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, § 7 (Williams, § 738.19); 1957, ch. 392, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-405; Acts 1983, ch. 380, § 1; 1993, ch. 196, § 5; 2017, ch. 131, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “, with the exception of retired judges,” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 131, § 2. April 17, 2017.

17-3-106. Rules of conduct for judges.

The conference shall have full power and authority to prescribe rules of official conduct of all judges, the rules to be in compliance with the code of judicial ethics as promulgated by the American Bar Association but not otherwise.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, § 5 (Williams, § 738.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-406.

17-3-107. Crime suppression recommendations.

It is the duty of the conference to give consideration to the enactment of laws and rules of procedure that in its judgment may be necessary to the more effective suppression of crime and thus promote peace and good order in the state. To this end, a committee of its members shall be appointed to draft suitable legislation and submit its recommendations to the general assembly.

Acts 1953, ch. 129, § 4 (Williams, § 738.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-407.